Illinois, session 104th, HB5604.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Cultural Districts Act. 6    Section 5. Cultural district. If an area successfully 7establishes itself as a cultural district under subsection (c) 8of Section 605-1057 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 9Opportunity Law, then the area may be incorporated as a 10cultural district as provided in this Act.  11    Section 10. Initial districts. The following districts are 12created as cultural districts:13        (1) the North First Street Cultural District in the 14    City of Champaign; 15        (2) the Bronzeville District in the City of Chicago; 16        (3) the Chinatown District in the City of Chicago;17        (4) the Clark Street/Camino Clark District in the City 18    of Chicago;19        (5) the Mahalia Jackson 79th Street Cultural District 20    in the City of Chicago;21        (6) the Little Village District in the City of 22    Chicago;  HB5604- 2 -LRB104 20103 RTM 33554 b1        (7) the Puerto Rico Town District in the City of 2    Chicago;3        (8) the South Chicago Cultural District in the City of 4    Chicago;5        (9) the Central East Cultural District in the City of 6    Springfield; 7        (10) the Southtown Cultural District in the City of 8    Springfield;9        (11) the Soul City District in the City of Chicago;10        (12) the City of Bloomington Downtown Cultural 11    District; 12        (13) the Heritage District in the City of Rockford; 13        (14) the Historic District of the City of Vienna; and14        (15) the Ukrainian Village District in the City of 15    Chicago; 16    Section 15. Petition for referendum. 17    (a) Any 200 legal voters residing within the limits of a 18proposed district may petition the circuit court of the county 19in which the proposed district lies for an order to submit the 20question to the electors of the proposed district whether or 21not it shall be organized as a cultural district under this 22Act. 23    (b) The petition must contain a definite description of 24the territory to be included within the district, the proposed 25name of the district, the name of each municipality within the   HB5604- 3 -LRB104 20103 RTM 33554 b1district, and a copy of certification as a State-designated 2cultural district under Section 605-1057 of the Department of 3Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law. 4    (c) Upon filing the petition in the office of the clerk of 5the circuit court of the county in which the territory lies, 6the circuit court shall fix a day and hour for a hearing on the 7petition, which shall be at least 15 days after the filing of 8the petition. The clerk of the circuit court shall cause a 9notice of the time and place of hearing to be published 3 10successive days in a newspaper having a general circulation in 11the territory of the proposed district. The date of the last 12publication of the notice must be at least 5 days before the 13time set for the hearing. 14    (d) At the hearing on the petition the court shall hear any 15person owning property or residing within the proposed 16district who desires to be heard. If the court finds that all 17of the provisions of this Act have been complied with, the 18court shall enter an order fixing and defining the boundaries 19and the name of the proposed district in accordance with the 20prayer of the petition. 21    (e) If any other petition for the organization of a 22cultural district in the same county is filed under this Act 23before the time fixed for the hearing of the first petition, 24the court shall postpone the hearing on the first petition, 25and the hearing on all petitions shall be set for the same day 26and hour. All petitions filed after the first petition shall   HB5604- 4 -LRB104 20103 RTM 33554 b1be assigned to the judge to whom the first petition is assigned 2so that all petitions may be heard by the same judge. If 2 or 3more petitions are filed under this Act and come on for hearing 4at the same time and the court finds that any of the territory 5included within any one of the petitions is included within or 6contiguous to the territory included in any other petition, 7the court may include all of the territory described in the 8petitions in one district and shall fix the name proposed in 9the petition first filed as the name of the district. 10    (f) After the entry of the order fixing and defining the 11boundaries and the name of a proposed district, the circuit 12court shall order that the question of organization of the 13proposed district be submitted to the electors of the proposed 14district. The clerk of the circuit court shall certify the 15order and the question to the proper election officials, who 16shall submit the question to the electors of the proposed 17district in accordance with the general election law. Notice 18of the referendum shall contain a definite description of the 19territory of the district and the proposed name of the 20district.21    (g) The proposition shall be substantially in the 22following form: 23        "Shall the (name of cultural district) be organized in 24    the territory described as follows: (insert 25    description)?". If a majority of the votes cast on the 26    question are in the affirmative, the district shall then   HB5604- 5 -LRB104 20103 RTM 33554 b1    be an organized cultural district under this Act. 2    Section 20. Governing body and officers. 3    (a) Unless the boundaries of a cultural district are the 4same as the boundaries of a county or municipality, the 5affairs of a cultural district shall be managed by a board of 6commissioners consisting of not less than 5 but not more than 9 7commissioners, who shall be appointed by the presiding officer 8of the county board of the county in which the majority of the 9cultural district is located, with the advice and consent of 10the county board. The first appointments shall be made more 11than 60 days but not more than 90 days after the district is 12created. Each commissioner must be a legal voter in the 13district. The first commissioners shall be appointed for terms 14ending June 30, one, 2, 3, 4, and 5 years after the district is 15organized, as determined by lot. Thereafter, successor 16commissioners shall be appointed for terms of 5 years. 17Commissioners shall receive no compensation but shall be 18reimbursed for their reasonable and necessary expenses 19incurred in the performance of official duties. 20    (b) If a commissioner is no longer a legal voter of the 21district, then the office shall immediately become vacant. If 22a vacancy in the office of commissioner occurs for any reason, 23then a successor shall be appointed for the remainder of the 24term in the same manner as other commissioners are appointed.25    (c) If the boundaries of a cultural district are the same   HB5604- 6 -LRB104 20103 RTM 33554 b1as the boundaries of a county or municipality, then the 2corporate authorities of the county or municipality shall have 3the powers and perform the duties of the commissioners and no 4commissioners shall be appointed for the district. The 5corporate authorities shall receive no additional compensation 6for governing the cultural district.7    (d) The board of commissioners of a cultural district 8shall appoint the treasurer of the cultural district by 9majority vote. 10    Section 25. Powers and duties. A cultural district may sue 11and be sued, enter into contracts, acquire and hold real and 12personal property necessary for its corporate purposes, and 13adopt a seal and alter the same at its pleasure.  14    Section 30. Real estate. A cultural district may acquire 15lands for its purposes (i) by lease, (ii) in fee simple by 16gift, grant, legacy, purchase, or condemnation, or (iii) by 17easement. 18    Section 35. Funds of the district. 19    (a) The board of commissioners, when requested by the 20treasurer of the district, shall designate one or more banks 21or savings and loan associations where the funds of the 22district received by the treasurer may be deposited. When a 23bank or savings and loan association has been designated as a   HB5604- 7 -LRB104 20103 RTM 33554 b1depository, it shall continue as a depository until 10 days 2after a new depository is designated and is qualified by 3furnishing the statements of resources and liabilities 4required by this Section. When a new depository is designated, 5the board of commissioners shall notify the sureties of the 6treasurer of that fact in writing at least 5 days before the 7transfer of funds. The treasurer of the district shall be 8discharged from responsibility for all funds and moneys while 9they are deposited in a designated bank or depository. 10    (b) A bank or savings and loan association shall not 11receive public funds as provided in this Section unless it has 12complied with the requirements of Section 6 of the Public 13Funds Investment Act. 14    Section 40. Records and reports. 15    (a) The board of commissioners shall keep a record of all 16proceedings which shall be open to the inspection of any 17person residing in the district at all reasonable and proper 18times. The board of commissioners shall report annually to the 19county board in which a majority of the cultural district is 20located concerning its revenues, expenditures, construction 21work, property, and other matters acted upon by the board of 22commissioners during the previous year. 23    (b) An action of the board of commissioners of a cultural 24district requires the affirmative vote of the majority of 25commissioners.   HB5604- 8 -LRB104 20103 RTM 33554 b1    Section 45. Debt and bonds. The board of commissioners of 2a cultural district may, for any of its authorized purposes, 3borrow money upon the faith and credit of the cultural 4district and may issue bonds. A district may not, however, 5become indebted in any manner or for any purpose to an amount 6including existing indebtedness in the aggregate exceeding 71.5% of the assessed value, as equalized by the Department of 8Revenue, of the taxable property in the district. A district 9may not incur indebtedness in excess of 0.3% of the assessed 10value, as equalized by the Department of Revenue, of taxable 11property in the district for the development of historical 12sites, together with related lands and facilities, held by the 13district. Before or at the time of issuing bonds, the board of 14commissioners shall provide by ordinance for the collection of 15an annual tax sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds as it 16falls due and to pay the principal of the bonds as they mature. 17The bonds shall mature not later than 20 years after the date 18thereof. The bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates as 19do not exceed those set forth in the Bond Authorization Act and 20shall be issuable upon any terms and may have provisions as 21make use of any authority as may be provided in the Local 22Government Debt Reform Act.